District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-4325

General agents, agents, or solicitors; issuance, expiration and renewal of required license; exceptions; termination of employment; information provided Superintendent deemed privileged

Repealed.

History

April 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-227, § 16, 44 DCR 140

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 35-425 to 35-428.

Editor's Notes

D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(i) ( 44 DCR 1730), effective May 21, 1997, amends the repealed sections subsequent to repeal.